Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 13. Crisis Intervention Teams.

§ 9.1-187.
Establishment of crisis intervention team programs.

By January 1, 2010, the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, utilizing such federal or state funding as may be available for this purpose, shall support the development and establishment of crisis intervention team programs in areas throughout the Commonwealth. Areas may be composed of any combination of one or more localities or institutions of higher education contained therein that may have law-enforcement officers as defined in §

9.1-101

. The crisis intervention teams shall assist law-enforcement officers in responding to crisis situations involving persons with mental illness, substance abuse problems, or both. The goals of the crisis intervention team programs shall be:

Providing immediate response by specially trained law-enforcement officers;

Reducing the amount of time officers spend out of service awaiting assessment and disposition;

Affording persons with mental illness, substance abuse problems, or both, a sense of dignity in crisis situations;

Reducing the likelihood of physical confrontation;

Decreasing arrests and use of force;

Identifying underserved populations with mental illness, substance abuse problems, or both, and linking them to appropriate care;

Providing support and assistance for mental health treatment professionals;

Decreasing the use of arrest and detention of persons experiencing mental health and/or substance abuse crises by providing better access to timely treatment;

Providing a therapeutic location or protocol for officers to bring individuals in crisis for assessment that is not a law-enforcement or jail facility;

Increasing public recognition and appreciation for the mental health needs of a community;

Decreasing injuries to law-enforcement officers during crisis events;

Reducing inappropriate arrests of individuals with mental illness in crisis situations; and

Decreasing the need for mental health treatment in jail.

The Department, in collaboration with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall establish criteria for the development of crisis intervention teams that shall include assessment of the effectiveness of the area’s plan for community involvement, training, and therapeutic response alternatives and a determination of whether law-enforcement officers have effective agreements with mental health care providers and all other community stakeholders.

By November 1, 2009, the Department, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall submit to the Joint Commission on Health Care a report outlining the status of the crisis intervention team programs, including copies of any requests for proposals and the criteria developed for such areas.

History.

2009, c. 715; 2012, c. 776.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “localities or institutions of higher education” was substituted for “counties, cities, towns, or colleges or universities” in the introductory paragraph of subsection A to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 776 deleted “or campus police officers appointed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 17 (§ 23-232 et seq.) of Title 23” from the end of the second sentence of the introductory paragraph of section A.

§ 9.1-188.
Crisis intervention training program.

The Department, in consultation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, and law-enforcement, brain injury, and mental health stakeholders, shall develop a crisis intervention training program divided into the following three categories: (i) a module of principles-based training to be included as a part of the compulsory minimum training standards subsequent to employment for all law-enforcement officers, (ii) a module of principles-based training to be included as a part of the basic training of and the recertification requirements for law-enforcement officers, and (iii) a comprehensive advanced training course for all persons involved in the crisis intervention team programs. Every locality shall establish or be part of a crisis intervention team program in accordance with the provisions of this article.

The curriculum for the basic training and recertification modules and the comprehensive advanced training course shall be approved for Department-certified in-service training credits for law-enforcement officers. All law-enforcement officers involved in a crisis intervention team program shall complete the comprehensive advanced training course in accordance with clause (iii). The comprehensive advanced training course’s curriculum developed in accordance with clause (iii) shall include a module on brain injury as part of the four hours of mandatory training in legal issues.

History.

2009, c. 715; 2020, cc. 514, 515; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 36.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 514 and 515 are identical, and in the first sentence, inserted “the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” and “brain injury”; in the last sentence, inserted “a module on brain injury as part of” and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 36, effective March 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 9.1-189.
Crisis intervention team protocol.

Each crisis intervention team shall develop a protocol that permits law-enforcement officers to release a person with mental illness, substance abuse problems, or both, whom they encounter in crisis situations from their custody when the crisis intervention team has determined the person is sufficiently stable and to refer him for emergency treatment services.

History.

2009, c. 715.

§ 9.1-190.
Crisis intervention team program assessment.

The Department, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall assess and report on the impact and effectiveness of the crisis intervention team programs in meeting the program goals. The assessment shall include, but not be limited to, consideration of the number of incidents, injuries to the parties involved, successes and problems encountered, the overall operation of the crisis intervention team programs, and recommendations for improvement of the program. The Department, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, shall submit a report to the Joint Commission on Health Care by November 15, 2009, 2010, and 2011.

History.

2009, c. 715.